Utah statutes.
72-7-403.   Towing requirements and limitations on towing.

(1) (a)  The draw-bar or other connection between any two vehicles, one of which is towing or drawing the other on a highway, may not exceed 15 feet in length from one vehicle to the other except in the case of a connection between any two vehicles transporting poles, pipe, machinery, or structural  material that cannot be dismembered when transported upon a pole trailer as defined in Section 41-6a-102.

(b)  When the connection between the two vehicles is a chain, rope, or cable, a red flag or other signal or cloth not less than 12 inches both in length and width shall be displayed on or near the midpoint of the connection.

(2)  A person may not operate a combination of vehicles when any trailer, semitrailer, or other vehicle being towed:

(a)  whips or swerves from side to side dangerously or unreasonably; or

(b)  fails to follow substantially in the path of the towing vehicle.

(3) A person who violates this section is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.

